New Jersey, session 222, S2555.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    Section 1 of P.L.2019, c.382 (C.19:31-6.4c) is amended to read as follows: 1.    Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, a person who is qualified to register to vote may submit a voter registration form electronically on a secure Internet website maintained by the Secretary of State, if the applicant has an email address and provides a valid New Jersey driver's license number, a valid New Jersey nondriver identification card number, or the last four digits of the applicant's Social Security number.  The voter registration form shall contain substantively the same information required to be contained on a paper voter registration form pursuant to section 16 of P.L.1974, c.30 (C.19:31-6.4).  The voter registration form available electronically shall also enable a person who is qualified to register to vote, and a person who is registered to vote, to declare a political party affiliation and to make changes to that affiliation, with an option to indicate no affiliation with any political party, by updating the online voter registration form.  Beginning on January 1, 2026 and thereafter, the voter registration form available electronically shall enable a person who is qualified to register to vote, and a person who is registered to vote, to apply for and receive a mail-in ballot as provided under section 3 of P.L.2009, c.79 (C.19:63-3), until the voter requests otherwise. a.     The Secretary of State shall apply the same voter registration deadline applicable under current law for paper voter registration forms to an online voter registration form submitted by an applicant pursuant to this section. b.    The applicant completing the form shall affirmatively attest to the truth of the information provided in the form. c.     For voter registration purposes, the applicant shall affirmatively assent to the use of his or her signature from his or her driver's license or non-driver identification card or the applicant's digitized or electronic signature. d.    For each online voter registration form, the Secretary of State shall obtain either an electronic copy of the applicant's signature from his or her driver's license or non-driver identification card directly from the New Jersey Motor Vehicle Commission, or the applicant's digitized or electronic signature. e.     Upon submission of an online voter registration form pursuant to this section, the electronic voter registration system shall automatically acknowledge that the online voter registration form has been submitted successfully, and provide instructions on how the person completing the voter registration form may follow-up on the status of the submission either online or by contacting the appropriate county commissioner of registration.  If a person submits more than one online voter registration form with identical information, the county commissioner of registration of the county in which the voter resides may process and adjudicate only the first online voter registration form submitted by the person through the system. f.     The Secretary of State shall employ security measures to ensure the accuracy and integrity of voter registration forms submitted electronically pursuant to this section. g.    The New Jersey Motor Vehicle Commission and the Secretary of State shall jointly develop a process and the infrastructure to allow the electronic copy of the applicant's signature and other information required under this section that is in the possession of the commission to be transferred to the Secretary of State and to the appropriate county election officials to allow a person who is qualified to register to vote in New Jersey to register to vote under this section. h.    If an applicant cannot electronically submit the information required pursuant to this section, the applicant shall nevertheless be able to complete the online voter registration form electronically on the Secretary of State's Internet website, print a paper copy of the completed form, and mail or deliver the paper copy of the completed form to the Secretary of State or the appropriate county election official. For the purposes of this subsection, the applicant shall be required to provide the same documents required to be provided with a paper voter registration form pursuant to R.S.19:31-5. i.     The voter registration form offered pursuant to this section at a New Jersey Motor Vehicle Commission agency location on an electronic signature pad shall contain substantively the same notice and affirmation of the penalty for providing false or fraudulent registration information required to be contained on a paper voter registration form pursuant to section 16 of P.L.1974, c.30 (C.19:31-6.4). (cf: P.L.2022, c.67, s.7) 2.    Section 24 of P.L.1994, c.182 (C.39:2-3.2) is amended to read as follows: 24. a. The Secretary of State, with the assistance of the Chief Administrator of the New Jersey Motor Vehicle Commission, shall provide for an eligible applicant to simultaneously apply for a motor vehicle driver's license, an examination permit, a probationary driver's license, or a non-driver identification card, as applicable, and be automatically registered to vote, or have an existing voter registration updated, in a manner which satisfies both the requirements necessary to receive a license to operate a motor vehicle, pursuant to R.S.39:3-10, or an examination permit, a probationary driver's license, or a non-driver identification card, as applicable, and to register to vote, pursuant to R.S.19:4-1.  The applicant shall be offered an opportunity to decline the automatic voter registration under this section.  If an applicant changes the applicant's party affiliation when updating an existing voter registration under this section, the applicant shall be sent a confirmation notice by the county commissioner of registration noting that change. b. (1) Pursuant to subsection a. of this section, for every application for a motor vehicle driver's license, an examination permit, a probationary driver's license, or a non-driver identification card, and each related update, renewal, or change of address, except as provided in paragraphs (2) and (3) of this subsection, the Chief Administrator shall ensure that the information necessary for voter registration is collected from the application and promptly transmitted electronically to the Secretary of State.  The Chief Administrator shall ensure that electronic records are not transmitted to the Secretary of State for any applicant who has declined registration.  The Commissioner of Registration shall register to vote or update an existing registration for any eligible applicant who has not declined voter registration. (2) Voter registration information from an application received online for the renewal of a motor vehicle driver's license or non-driver identification card shall be collected and promptly transmitted electronically to the Secretary of State upon the implementation by the Secretary of State of online voter registration.  Subsection c. of this section shall be inapplicable to such applications until that time. (3) Voter registration information from an application received through the mail for the renewal of a motor vehicle driver's license or non-driver identification card shall be exempt from collection and electronic transmission to the Secretary of State until such time as the Chief Administrator determines that the prompt electronic transmission of the information is practicable.  Subsection c. of this section shall be inapplicable to such applications until that time.  Following the effective date of P.L.2018, c.6, the Chief Administrator shall inform the Governor and the Legislature every six months of the practicability of collecting and transmitting to the Secretary of State voter registration information from such applications.  This paragraph shall not be construed to preclude the Motor Vehicle Commission from processing voter registration applications received in the manner in which such applications were processed in connection with such renewals prior to the effective date of P.L.2018, c.6. c.     The Chief Administrator shall provide for the following notices to be provided with every application for a motor vehicle driver's license, an examination permit, a probationary driver's license, or a non-driver identification card and every related update, renewal, or change of address, including on voter registration applications processed through an electronic signature pad: (1) a notice that the applicant will be registered to vote, if eligible, unless the applicant specifically declines the automatic voter registration; (2) a notice of the voter eligibility requirements under R.S.19:4-1 and the penalties for false registration and illegal voting under Title 19 of the Revised Statutes, which notice shall contain an affirmation that the applicant meets each such requirement and shall require the signature of the applicant, under penalty of law; and (3) a notice that an applicant who is a victim of domestic violence or stalking may decline the automatic voter registration and register to vote without disclosing the applicant's street address pursuant to section 1 of P.L.1994, c.148 (C.19:31-3.2). d.    For each applicant already registered to vote, any change of address notification submitted to the Chief Administrator for the purpose of maintaining current information on an applicant shall be promptly reported to the Secretary of State.  A change of address notification received by the Chief Administrator in paper format shall be reported to the Secretary of State no later than the 10th day following its receipt by the Chief Administrator.  The Commissioner of Registration shall use the change of address notification to update an existing voter registration unless the applicant declines the automatic voter registration pursuant to this section and indicates that the change of address is not for voter registration purposes.  A change of address notification submitted to the commission, which is used for voter registration purposes, shall be subject to the provisions of section 1 of P.L.1994, c.148 (C.19:31-3.2) if the person submitting the change of address notification previously registered to vote in accordance with that section. e.     If a person who is not entitled to vote becomes registered to vote pursuant to this section, that person's registration shall be presumed to have been effected with official authorization, and the person shall not be deemed to have committed a crime under R.S.19:34-1.  This subsection shall not apply to a person who knowingly and willfully makes a false statement to effectuate voter registration. f.     The Secretary of State, with the assistance of the Chief Administrator, shall take appropriate measures to educate the public about voter registration under this section. For the purposes of this section, "eligible applicant" means a person submitting to the commission an application for a motor vehicle driver's license, an examination permit, a probationary driver's license, or a non-driver identification card who meets all requirements for eligibility to vote under R.S.19:4-1. (cf: P.L.2022, c.70, s.6) 3.    This act shall take effect on the 30th day following the date of enactment.